Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 3 Registration
§ 22-3-118.
Proof of identity.

Unless a voter is challenged pursuant to W.S.

22-15-101

through

22-15-109

, no identification shall be required when:

Voting by absentee ballot after having registered in person; or

Voting by absentee ballot after having registered by mail and having submitted a copy of the person’s acceptable identification, as set forth in W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(A), at the time of registration.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 100, § 2.

Voters who are challenged and are unable to provide the required proof of identity shall be offered provisional ballots in accordance with W.S.

22-15-105

and permitted until the close of business on the day following the election to present documentation to the county clerk establishing their eligibility to vote.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to elections conducted pursuant to chapter 29 of this Election Code.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 100, § 2.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 1; 2020 ch. 100, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(ii) substituted “having submitted a copy of the person's acceptable identification, as set forth in W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix), at the time of registration” for “having previously voted in a Wyoming federal election”; repealed (b) and (c), which read “(b) Prior to voting, when a voter has registered by mail and is voting in person in his first Wyoming federal election, he shall provide: (i) A current, valid photo identification; or (ii) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, government check or other government document which shows his name and address. (c) When a voter has registered by mail and he is voting by mail in his first Wyoming federal election, he shall submit with his absentee ballot: (i) A copy of a current, valid photo identification; or (ii) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document which shows his name and address.”; in (d) substituted “who are challenged and are unable” for “who are unable,” “proof of identity” for “proof under the applicable provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section,” and “to vote” for “to vote in the precinct”; and repealed (f), which read “As used in this section “Wyoming federal election” means a primary election, general election or a special election for federal office held in this state.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(i) and (a)(ii), deleted "in person or" following "Voting," substituted "absentee ballot" for "mail"; and added "(A)" following "W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)" in (a)(ii).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

Am Jur 2d and C.J.S. references

Constitutionality of Requiring Presentation of Photographic Identification in Order to Vote. 27 A.L.R.6th 541.